District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0341.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
23 act may be cited as the "Business Licensing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2025".
24 Sec. 2. Section l 3(q) of the Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective
25 March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official Code§ 1-309.l0(q)), is amended to read as
26 follows:
27 "(q)(l) Before granting or renewing a license for a theater, cinema, skating rink, dance
28 hall, exhibition, lecture, or other entertainment, the Department of Licensing and Consumer
29 Protection shall give 30 days notice by first-class mail or electronic mail to the affected
30 Commission. The notice shall contain the name of the applicant and a description, by street
31 number, or other plain designation, of the particular location for which the license is requested.

32 “(2) Pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the Department of Licensing and
33 Consumer Protection shall give great weight to the Commission’s recommendations when
34 determining whether to grant or renew the licenses.”.
35 Sec. 3. Chapter 28 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
36 follows:
37 (a) The table of contents is amended by adding a new section designation to read as
38 follows:
39 “§ 47-2851.25. Refund of erroneously paid fees.”.
40 (b) Section 47-2851.04 is amended as follows:
41 (1) Subsection (a) is amended as follows:
42 (A) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
43 phrase “; and” in its place.
44 (B) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
45 “(3) $198 for a 4-year license.”.
46 (2) Subsection (b) is amended as follows:
47 (A) Paragraph (1) is amended by striking the phrase “; and” and inserting
48 a semicolon in its place.
49 (B) Paragraph (2) is amended by striking the period and inserting the
50 phrase “; and” in its place.
51 (C) A new paragraph (3) is added to read as follows:
52 “(3) A 4-year license, a person shall pay a license fee of $198.”
53 (c) Section 47-2851.07(c) is amended to read as follows:

54 “(c) Licenses issued under this subchapter shall be valid for a period of 6 months, 2 years,
55 or 4 years.”.
56 (d) Section 47-2851.10(b)(3)(B) is amended by striking the phrase “, but less than 9
57 months”.
58 (e) A new section 47-2851.25 is added to read as follows:
59 “§ 47-2851.25. Refund of erroneously paid fees.
60 “The Mayor may refund any license fee or tax, or portion thereof, erroneously paid or
61 collected under this chapter.”.
62 Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
63 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
64 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
65 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
66 Sec. 5. Effective date.
67 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
68 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
69 90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
70 412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
71 D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).

Government of the District of Columbia
Office of the Chief Financial Officer
Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
MEMORANDUM
TO: The Honorable Phil Mendelson
Chairman, Council of the District of Columbia
FROM: Glen Lee
Chief Financial Officer
DATE: September 7, 2025
SUBJECT: Fiscal Impact Statement – Business Licensing Reform Emergency (and
Accompanying Temporary) Amendment Act of 2025
REFERENCE: Draft Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 2,
2025
Conclusion
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2025 budget and fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year
2029 budget and financial plan to implement the bill.
Background
Current law1 gives Advisory Neighborhood Commissions (ANCs) advisory authority with respect to
District government policymaking on decisions regarding planning, streets, recreation, social
services programs, education, health, safety, budget, and sanitation, which affect that Commission
area. The bill requires the Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection (DLCP) to give 30-days’
notice2 to an ANC regarding the issuance or renewal of licenses for entertainment venues3 and give
“great weight”4 to the ANC’s feedback.
1 Advisory Neighborhood Commissions Act of 1975, effective March 26, 1976 (D.C. Law 1-58; D.C. Official
Code § 1-309.10)
2 The notice must contain applicant name and description of location of the venue.
3 Entertainment venues include theaters, cinemas, skating rinks, dance halls, exhibitions, lectures or other
entertainment.
4 “Great weight” requires acknowledgement of the Commission as the source of the recommendations and
explicit reference to each of the Commission’s issues and concerns. D.C. Code § 1-309.10(d)(3)(A).
1350 Pennsylvania Avenue, NW, Suite 203, Washington, DC 20004 (202)727-2476
www.cfo.dc.gov

The Honorable Phil Mendelson
FIS: “Business Licensing Reform Emergency (and Accompanying Temporary) Amendment Act of 2025”, Draft
Bill as provided to the Office of Revenue Analysis on September 2, 2025
The bill provides the option for a 4-year5 basic business license6 and specifies that the required fees
for the initial license and for the renewal are $198, respectively. For renewals, in addition to the fee,
reinspection by the DLCP is required. If a license has lapsed for more than 6-months7,8, a licensee
may apply for renewal upon payment of a $3508 penalty and any other applicable fees as prescribed
by law. The Mayor is authorized to refund any license fee or tax, in whole or in part, erroneously paid
or collected.
The Temporary Amendment would expire 225 days post effective date.
Financial Plan Impact
Funds are sufficient in the revised fiscal year 2025 budget and fiscal year 2026 through fiscal year
2029 budget and financial plan to implement the bill. The DLCP can provide notice to, and receive
feedback from, affected ANCs using its current resources. The bill’s proposed 4-year license fee is set
at twice the 2-year fee and is therefore not projected to negatively impact revenues over the financial
plan.
5 Current law provides for a 6-month license ($49) or a 2-year license ($99).
6 D.C. Code § 47–2851.04.
7 D.C. Law 24-333 law allows for more than 6-months, but less than 9-months.
8 Pursuant to the approved budget and financial plan, this section of the Business and Entrepreneurship
Support to Thrive Amendment Act of 2022, effective March 22, 2023 (D.C. Law 24-333; 70 DCR 1524) is
effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 of 2

GOVERNMENT OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA
OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL
BRIAN L. SCHWALB PRIVILEGED AND CONFIDENTIAL
ATTORNEY GENERAL ATTORNEY-CLIENT COMMUNICATION
LEGAL COUNSEL DIVISION
MEMORANDUM
TO: Tomás Talamante
Director
Office of Policy and Legislative Affairs
FROM: Adele El-Khouri
Deputy Attorney General
Legal Counsel Division
DATE: September 3, 2025
SUBJECT: Legal Sufficiency Review of Draft Legislation, the “Business Licensing Reform
Emergency Act of 2025, Temporary Version, Emergency Declaration Resolution, and
Cover Letter”
(AE-25-53)
_____________________________________________________________________________________
This is to Certify that
the Office of the Attorney General has reviewed the
above-referenced legislation and found it to be legally sufficient. If you have any questions in this
regard, please do not hesitate to call me at (202) 262-6402.
_________________________________
Adele El-Khouri
3